New York, session 2025-2026, S7943.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 6 of section 152-d of the social services law, 2 as added by chapter 70 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 6. The office of temporary and disability assistance shall make a 5 model sign available on its website that can be used by any person, 6 firm, partnership, association or corporation required to inform indi- 7 viduals about electronic benefit transfer scams, including, but not 8 limited to, skimming, and the steps they can take to protect their bene- 9 fits in accordance with section three hundred ninety-e of the general 10 business law. Such sign shall be made available in English and in the 11 twelve languages most commonly spoken by limited English proficient 12 individuals in the state. 13 § 2. Subdivision 7 of section 95-a of the social services law, as 14 added by chapter 546 of the laws of 1978, is amended to read as 15 follows: 16 7. [In accordance with applicable federal laws, rules and regulations 17 the] The department shall make available appropriate [bilingual] materi- 18 als in English and in the twelve languages most commonly spoken by 19 limited English proficient individuals in the state so that potentially 20 eligible non English speaking individuals may be informed about the food 21 stamp program. 22 § 3. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 23 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11997-02-5